pt-PT: Método de aplicação da tinta: Spray aerossol; Aplicação com pincel; Marcador/caneta; Aplicação com rolo; Pistola de pulverização; Outro
nl: Aanbrengmethode verf: Spuitbus; Kwast; Stift/pen; Roller; Verfspuit; Overig
sl-SI: Metoda nanašanja barve: Sprej v aerosolu; Nanašanje s čopičem; Marker/pisalo; Nanašanje z valjčkom; Brizgalna pištola; Drugo
bg-BG: Метод за нанасяне на боя: Аерозолен спрей; С четка; Маркер/химикалка; С валяк; Пистолет за боядисване; Друго
ro-RO: Metodă de aplicare a vopselei: Spray cu aerosoli; Aplicare cu pensula; Marker/Stilou; Aplicare cu trafaletul; Pistol de vopsit; Altele
nb: Påføringsmetode for maling: Aerosolspray; Pensles på; Tusj/penn; Rulles på; Sprøytepistol; Annet
fr: Méthode d'application de la peinture: Vaporisateur aérosol; Au pinceau; Marqueur/stylo; Au rouleau; Pistolet pulvérisateur; Autre
fi: Maalin levitysmenetelmä: Aerosolisuihke; Siveltävä; Tussi/kynä; Telattava; Maaliruisku; Muu
pl: Metoda nakładania farby: Aerozol; Nakładanie pędzlem; Marker/Pisak; Nakładanie wałkiem; Pistolet natryskowy; Inne
ru: Метод нанесения краски: Аэрозольный спрей; Кистью; Маркер/Ручка; Валиком; Краскопульт; Другое
sv: Metod för färgapplicering: Aerosolspray; Penselapplicering; Märkpennor/pennor; Rullapplicering; Färgspruta; Övrigt
tr: Boya uygulama yöntemi: Aerosol sprey; Fırçalı; Keçeli/Kurşun kalem; Rulolu; Boya tabancası; Diğer
de: Farbaufbringungsmethode: Aerosolspray; Zum Aufpinseln; Marker/Stift; Zum Aufrollen; Sprühpistole; Sonstige
vi: Phương pháp sơn: Bình xịt khí dung; Quét bằng cọ; Bút đánh dấu/Bút; Lăn bằng con lăn; Súng phun sơn; Khác
it: Metodo di applicazione della vernice: Spray aerosol; A pennello; Pennarello/penna; A rullo; Pistola a spruzzo; Altro
ko: 페인트 도장 방식: 에어로졸 스프레이; 브러시온; 마커/펜; 롤온; 스프레이 건; 기타
zh-TW: 塗料應用方式: 噴霧; 刷塗; 麥克筆/畫筆; 滾塗; 噴槍; 其他
zh-CN: 油漆涂装方法: 气雾喷涂; 刷涂; 马克笔/钢笔涂; 滚涂; 喷枪喷涂; 其他
es: Método de aplicación de la pintura: Aerosol; Para aplicar con brocha; Marcador/bolígrafo; Para aplicar con rodillo; Pistola pulverizadora; Otro
hr-HR: Način nanošenja boje: Aerosolni sprej; Nanošenje kistom; Marker/olovka; Nanošenje valjkom; Pištolj za prskanje; Ostalo
ja: ペイント適用方法: エアロゾルスプレー; 刷毛塗り; マーカー/ペン; ロールオン; スプレーガン; その他
sk-SK: Spôsob nanášania farby: Aerosólový sprej; Nanášanie štetcom; Značkovač/pero; Nanášanie valčekom; Striekacia pištoľ; Iné
en: Paint application method: Aerosol spray; Brush-on; Marker/Pen; Roll-on; Spray gun; Other
pt-BR: Tinta, método de aplicação: Spray aerossol; Aplicação com pincel; Marcador/caneta; Aplicação com rolo; Pistola de pintura; Outro
cs: Způsob nanášení barvy: Sprej; Štětec; Fix/pero; Váleček; Stříkací pistole; Jiné
th: วิธีการทาสี: สเปรย์กระป๋อง; ทาด้วยพู่กัน/แปรง; มาร์กเกอร์/ปากกา; ลูกกลิ้ง; ปืนพ่นสี; อื่นๆ
da: Påføringsmetode for maling: Aerosolspray; Påføring med pensel; Markør/pen; Påføring med rulle; Sprøjtepistol; Andet
lt-LT: Dažų naudojimo būdas: Purškiamas aerozolis; Užtepamas teptuku; Žymeklis / rašiklis; Užtepamas voleliu; Purškimo pistoletas; Kita
el: Μέθοδος εφαρμογής βαφής: Σπρέι (αεροζόλ); Με πινέλο; Μαρκαδόρος/Πενάκι; Με ρολό; Πιστόλι βαφής; Άλλο
hu: Festék felvitelének módja: Aeroszolos spray; Ecsetelhető; Filctoll/Toll; Hengerelhető; Szórópisztoly; Egyéb